District of Columbia statutes.
47-406

Powers of Mayor — Adjustment of certain rates.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized from time to time to adjust the rates to be charged for issuing certificates of real estate taxes and assessments due and for duplicating District of Columbia tax returns. Notice of changes in such rates shall be published in accordance with the provisions of § 2-501et seq. and, in addition, shall be filed with the Council of the District of Columbia at least 30 days prior to their effective date.

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-57, § 5, 24 DCR 5426
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-406.
1973 Ed., § 47-306.1.